Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-3] Definitions.
As used in this chapter:

"Continuing care retirement
community" means an entity providing nursing facility services, along with
assisted living or independent living on a contiguous campus with the number of
assisted living and independent living beds in the aggregate being at least
twice the number of nursing facility beds. For purposes of this definition,
"contiguous" means land adjoining or touching other property held by
the same or related organization, and includes land divided by a public road.

"Department" means the department of
human services.

"Net patient service revenue" means
gross inpatient revenues from services provided to nursing facility patients
less reductions from gross inpatient revenue resulting from an inability to
collect payment of charges. Inpatient service revenue excludes non-patient
care revenues, such as revenues from beauty and barber services, vending
income, interest and contributions, revenues from the sale of meals, and all
outpatient revenues. Reductions from gross revenue include contractual
adjustments, uncompensated care, administrative, courtesy, and policy discounts
and adjustments, and other revenue deductions.

"Nursing facility" means any facility
licensed pursuant to chapter 11-94.1, Hawaii administrative rules.

"Resident day" means a calendar day
of care provided to a nursing facility resident, including the day of admission
and excluding the day of discharge; provided that one resident day shall be
deemed to exist when admission and discharge occur on the same day. A resident
day includes a day on which a bed is held for a patient and for which the
facility receives compensation for holding the bed. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5;
am L 2013, c 142, §§2(1), 3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next